District of Columbia statutes.
34-2202.12

Repealed

Transfer of funds.

Repealed.

Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-111, § 211, 43 DCR 548
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-184, § 202(i), 43 DCR 4265
1981 Ed., § 43-1682.
For temporary repeal of section, see § 2(i) of the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-293, July 9, 1996, 43 DCR 4160), § 2(i) of the Water and Sewer Authority Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-397, October 9, 1996, 43 DCR 5686), § 2(i) of the Water and Sewer Authority Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-466, December 30, 1996, 44 DCR 165), see § 2(i) of the Water and Sewer Authority Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-48, March 31, 1997, 44 DCR 2105).